Vermont, session 2025-2026, H533.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
Sec. 1. RULEMAKING; NEWBORN SCREENING PROGRAM
The Department of Health shall amend its rule pertaining to the newborn
screening program pursuant to 3 V.S.A. chapter 25 to include testing for
congenital cytomegalovirus (cCMV). The Department shall further amend its
rule to ensure information is distributed to expectant parents, hospitals,
birthing centers, and health care providers offering prenatal, postnatal,
VT LEG #385165 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.533
2026 Page 2 of 4
pediatric, and fertility counseling services about each of the diseases and
conditions tested as part of the newborn screening program, including:
(1) an overview of each disease or condition;
(2) the incidence of each disease or condition;
(3) transmission specifically of cytomegalovirus to pregnant women;
(4) birth defects associated with each disease or condition;
(5) testing and methods of diagnosis for each disease or condition;
(6) any known preventative measures for a disease or condition; and
(7) any other relevant resources.
Sec. 2. 18 V.S.A. § 994 is added to read:
§ 994. CONGENITAL CYTOMEGALOVIRUS ADVISORY COMMITTEE
(a) Creation. There is created the Congenital Cytomegalovirus Advisory
Committee to advise the Department and make recommendations regarding
congenital cytomegalovirus.
(b) Membership. The Advisory Committee shall be composed of the
following members, who shall be appointed by the Commissioner of Health:
(1) a representative of the Department, who shall serve as chair;
(2) a representative of a hospital licensed in Vermont;
(3) a primary care pediatrician or family practitioner licensed in
Vermont;
VT LEG #385165 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.533
2026 Page 3 of 4
(4) an otolaryngologist licensed in Vermont;
(5) a neonatologist licensed in Vermont;
(6) an infectious disease specialist licensed in Vermont;
(7) a health care provider representing newborn nurseries;
(8) an audiologist licensed in Vermont;
(9) an ophthalmologist licensed in Vermont;
(10) an obstetrician-gynecologist licensed in Vermont;
(11) a representative of Help Me Grow Vermont;
(12) two parents or guardians of a child impacted by congenital
cytomegalovirus; and
(13) a teacher licensed in Vermont who specializes in working with
children who are Deaf, Hard of Hearing, or Deafblind.
(c) Powers and duties. The Advisory Committee shall:
(1) advise the Department regarding the validity and cost of proposed
congenital cytomegalovirus screenings;
(2) recommend standards for performing and interpreting screening tests
based on the most current technological methods for documenting test results
and follow-up care;
(3) recommend standards for facilitating interactions between parents or
guardians and health care providers and agencies that participate in follow-up
care; and
VT LEG #385165 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.533
2026 Page 4 of 4
(4) propose public education campaign initiatives about diseases and
conditions for which newborns are screened, including specifically
cytomegalovirus.
(d) Assistance. The Advisory Committee shall have the administrative,
technical, and legal assistance of the Department.
(e) Report. Annually, on or before February 1, the Advisory Committee
shall submit a written report to the House Committee on Health Care and to the
Senate Committee on Health and Welfare with its findings and any
recommendations for legislative action.
(f) Meetings.
(1) A majority of the membership shall constitute a quorum.
(2) Meetings shall be held not less than twice annually.
(g) Compensation and reimbursement. For attendance at meetings during
adjournment of the General Assembly, a legislative member of the Advisory
Committee shall be entitled to per diem compensation and reimbursement of
expenses pursuant to 2 V.S.A. § 23 for not more than four meetings annually.
These payments shall be made from monies appropriated to the Department.
Sec. 3. EFFECTIVE DATE
This act shall take effect on July 1, 2026.
VT LEG #385165 v.2